Massachusetts, session 194th, H3362.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any health care or health
insurance-related regulation, an agency must file with the secretary of state’s office a public
notice of the proposed action and include a premium impact statement. In the statement, the
agency must consider the impact the proposed action will or will not have on health insurance
premium rates in Massachusetts. The agency must afford the public an opportunity to present
data, views, or arguments related to the impact statement, and prior to adopting the proposed
regulation, the agency must file an amended premium impact statement with the secretary of
state’s office.
SECTION 2. Any joint committee, house committee, or senate committee may report
favorably any bill or petition relative to health care or health insurance so long as that bill or
of 2

petition shall have first received a premium impact statement conducted by the center for health
information and analysis. Any joint committee, house committee or senate committee shall refer
all healthcare and health insurance related bills or petitions to an accompanied study order
pending a final report by the center for health information and analysis pursuant to this section."
of 2